tests/morphophonology/pending/E-phon.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] di": 
    ди<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : ди

  "[twol] (pres forms from negatives) ambiguous back vowels": 
    яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : язмыйсың
    яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : язмый
    яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : язмыйбыз

  "[twol] (pres forms from negatives) unambiguous back vowels (басарга)": 
    бас<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : басмыйсың
    бас<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : басмый
    бас<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : басмыйбыз

  "[twol] (pres forms from negatives) front vowels (белергә)": 
    бел<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : белмисең
    бел<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : белми
    бел<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : белмибез

  "[twol] (optatives) 3p.pl":
     кара<vaux><opt><p3><pl> : карасыннар
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : бәйләсеннәр
     укы<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : укысыннар
     селке<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : селкесеннәр
     сук<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : суксыннар
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : сүксеннәр
     буя<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : буясыннар
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : сөйсеннәр

  "[twol] (optatives) 3p.sg":
     кара<vaux><opt><p3><sg> : карасын
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : бәйләсен
     укы<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : укысын
     селке<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : селкесен
     сук<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : суксын
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : сүксен
     буя<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : буясын
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : сөйсен
     си<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : сисен

  "[twol] (optatives) 1p.sg":
     кара<vaux><opt><p1><sg> : карыйм
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : бәйлим
     укы<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : укыйм
     селке<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : селким
     сук<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : сугыйм
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : сүгим
     буя<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : буйыйм
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : сөйим
     си<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : сиим

  "[twol] (optatives) 1p.pl":
     кара<vaux><opt><p1><pl> : карыйк
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бәйлик
     укы<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : укыйк
     селке<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : селкик
     сук<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : сугыйк
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : сүгик
     буя<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : буйыйк
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : сөйик

  "[twol] (y-ligatures) normal words with final й that should disappear":
    куй<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : куям
    өй<n><px1sg><nom> : өем

  "[twol] (pres forms from w-phon) some у verb forms": 
    ту<v><iv><pres><p3><sg> : туа
    ту<v><iv><pres><p2><pl> : туасыз

  "[twol] Pres forms of verbs ending with -ә": 
    эшлә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : эшли
    эзлә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : эзли
    сөйлә<v><tv><prc_impf> : сөйли
    үтә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : үти
    билә<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : били

  "[twol] укы and төзе": 
    укы<v><iv><pres><p3><sg> : укый
    төзе<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : төзи
